nl: Rolkooi buismateriaal: 4130 chromoly staal; Aluminium; DOM-staal; Zacht staal (ERW); Roestvrij staal; T45-staal; Overige
pt-BR: Gaiola de proteção material dos tubos: Aço cromo-molibdênio 4130; Alumínio; Aço DOM; Aço-carbono (ERW); Aço inoxidável; Aço T45; Outro
nb: Materiale i veltebøyle-rør: 4130 chromoly-stål; Aluminium; DOM-stål; Bløtt stål (ERW); Rustfritt stål; T45-stål; Annet
bg-BG: Материал на тръбите на предпазната клетка: 4130 хромолибденова стомана; Алуминий; DOM стомана; Мека стомана (ERW); Неръждаема стомана; T45 стомана; Друго
fr: Matériau des tubes de l’arceau de sécurité: Acier chromoly 4130; Aluminium; Acier DOM; Acier doux (ERW); Acier inoxydable; Acier T45; Autre
es: Material de los tubos de la jaula antivuelco: Acero cromolio 4130; Aluminio; Acero DOM; Acero dulce (ERW); Acero inoxidable; Acero T45; Otro
sl-SI: Material cevi varnostne kletke: Krom-molibdenovo jeklo 4130; Aluminij; Jeklo DOM; Mehko jeklo (ERW); Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo T45; Drugo
en: Roll cage tubing material: 4130 chromoly steel; Aluminum; DOM steel; Mild steel (ERW); Stainless steel; T45 steel; Other
pt-PT: Material da tubagem da gaiola de proteção: Aço cromoly 4130; Alumínio; Aço DOM; Aço macio (ERW); Aço inoxidável; Aço T45; Outro
lt-LT: Apsauginio karkaso vamzdžių medžiaga: 4130 chromomolibdeninis plienas; Aliuminis; DOM plienas; Mažaanglis plienas (ERW); Nerūdijantis plienas; T45 plienas; Kita
da: Materiale til rør til rullebur: 4130-chromoly-stål; Aluminium; DOM-stål; Blødt stål (ERW); Rustfrit stål; T45-stål; Andet
hr-HR: Materijal cijevi kaveza za rolete: Krom-molibden čelik 4130; Aluminij; DOM čelik; Meki čelik (ERW); Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik T45; Ostalo
tr: Devrilme kafesi boru malzemesi: 4130 kromoli çelik; Alüminyum; DOM çelik; Yumuşak çelik (ERW); Paslanmaz çelik; T45 çelik; Diğer
ko: 롤 케이지 튜브 소재: 4130 크로몰리 스틸; 알루미늄; DOM 스틸; 연강(ERW); 스테인리스 스틸; T45 스틸; 기타
sk-SK: Materiál rúrok ochrannej klietky: Chróm-molybdénová oceľ 4130; Hliník; Oceľ DOM; Mäkká oceľ (ERW); Nerezová oceľ; Oceľ T45; Iné
vi: Vật liệu ống khung bảo vệ: Thép chromoly 4130; Nhôm; Thép DOM; Thép mềm (ERW); Thép không gỉ; Thép T45; Khác
pl: Materiał rur klatki bezpieczeństwa: Stal chromowo-molibdenowa 4130; Aluminium; Stal DOM; Stal miękka (ERW); Stal nierdzewna; Stal T45; Inne
ru: Материал труб каркаса безопасности: Хромомолибденовая сталь 4130; Алюминий; Сталь DOM; Мягкая сталь (ERW); Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь T45; Другое
de: Rohrmaterial des Überrollkäfigs: 4130-Chrommolybdänstahl; Aluminium; DOM-Stahl; Baustahl (ERW); Edelstahl; T45-Stahl; Sonstige
sv: Material för rullburrör: 4130 chromoly-stål; Aluminium; DOM-stål; Olegerat stål (ERW); Rostfritt stål; T45-stål; Övrigt
hu: Bukókeret csőanyaga: 4130 króm-molibdén acél; Alumínium; DOM acél; Lágyacél (ERW); Rozsdamentes acél; T45 acél; Egyéb
zh-TW: 防滾籠管材材質: 4130 鉻鉬鋼; 鋁; DOM 鋼; 低碳鋼 (ERW); 不鏽鋼; T45 鋼; 其他
zh-CN: 防滚架管材材料: 4130 铬钼钢; 铝; DOM 钢; 低碳钢 (ERW); 不锈钢; T45 钢; 其他
cs: Materiál trubek ochranného rámu: Chrommolybdenová ocel 4130; Hliník; Tažená ocel (DOM); Konstrukční ocel (ERW); Nerezová ocel; Ocel T45; Jiné
ro-RO: Material al țevilor pentru cușca de protecție: Oțel crom-molibden 4130; Aluminiu; Oțel DOM; Oțel moale (ERW); Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel T45; Altele
ja: ロールケージのチューブ材: 4130 クロモリ鋼; アルミニウム; DOM 鋼; 軟鋼 (ERW); ステンレス鋼; T45 鋼; その他
fi: Turvakaaren putkimateriaali: 4130-kromimolybdeeniteräs; Alumiini; DOM-teräs; Niukkahiilinen teräs (ERW); Ruostumaton teräs; T45-teräs; Muu
el: Υλικό κατασκευής σωλήνων του κλωβού ασφαλείας: Χρωμιομολυβδαινιούχος χάλυβας 4130; Αλουμίνιο; Χάλυβας DOM; Μαλακός χάλυβας (ERW); Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Χάλυβας T45; Άλλο
th: วัสดุท่อโครงเหล็กกันกระแทก: เหล็กโครโมลี่ 4130; อลูมิเนียม; เหล็ก DOM; เหล็กเหนียว (ERW); สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็ก T45; อื่นๆ
it: Materiale tubolare per roll-bar: Acciaio cromo-molibdeno 4130; Alluminio; Acciaio DOM; Acciaio dolce (ERW); Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio T45; Altro